Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-779
Enforcement powers; Attorney General
or county attorney; duties.

(1)
To obtain compliance with the Anthrax Control Act, the department may apply
for a temporary restraining order, a temporary or permanent injunction, or
a mandatory injunction against any person violating or threatening to violate
the act or any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder. The
district court of the county where the violation is occurring or is about
to occur has jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief
may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and
shall be granted without bond.

(2) The Attorney General
or the county attorney of the county where violations of the act or any rules
or regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder are occurring or about to
occur shall, when notified of such violation or threatened violation, cause
appropriate proceedings under subsection (1) of this section to be instituted
and pursued without delay and shall prosecute violations under sections 54-771,
54-778, and 54-781 without delay.

Laws 2009, LB99, § 16.